Utah statutes.
61-1-14.5.   Burden of proving exemption.

In any proceeding under this chapter, civil, criminal, administrative, or judicial, the burden of proving an exemption under Section 61-1-14 or an exception from a definition under Section 61-1-13 is upon the person claiming the exemption or exception.

